test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s1x30_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - læga: # 
    læga+V+Inf: læga
    læga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [lægir, lægar]
    læga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: lægdi, lægaði]
    læga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [lægdu, lægaðu]
    læga+V+Sup: [lægt, lægað]
    læga+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [lægdur, lægaður]

  Verb - læga: # 
    skeina+V+Inf: skeina
    skeina+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [skeinir, skeinar]
    skeina+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [skeindi, skeinaði]
    skeina+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [skeindu, skeinaðu]
    skeina+V+Sup: [skeint, skeinað]
    skeina+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [skeindur, skeinaður]
